Maryland, session 2026, HB1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
4–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Accessory dwelling unit” means a secondary dwelling unit that is:
(i) on the same lot, parcel, or tract as a primary single–family
detached dwelling unit; and
(ii) not greater than 75% of the size of and subordinate in use to the
primary single–family detached dwelling unit.
(2) “Accessory dwelling unit” includes a structure that is:
(i) separate from the primary single–family detached dwelling unit;
or
(ii) attached as an addition to the primary single–family detached
dwelling unit.
(c) (1) “Dwelling unit” means a single unit providing complete living facilities
for at least one individual, including, at a minimum, provisions for sanitation, cooking,
eating, and sleeping.
(2) “Dwelling unit” does not include a unit in a multifamily residential
building.
(D) (1) “EXTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” MEANS AN ACCESSORY
DWELLING UNIT THAT IS DETACHED FROM THE PRIMARY DWELLING UNIT.
(2) “EXTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” INCLUDES:
(I) A BACKYARD COTTAGE;

HOUSE BILL 1538 3
(II) A CONVERTED CARRIAGE HOUSE; OR
(III) A MODULAR UNIT.
(E) (1) “INTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” MEANS AN ACCESSORY
DWELLING UNIT LOCATED WITHIN THE FOOTPRINT OF THE PRIMARY
SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT.
(2) “INTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” INCLUDES AN
ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT CREATED THROUGH THE CONVERSION OF A
BASEMENT, AN ATTIC, OR AN ATTACHED GARAGE SPACE OF THE PRIMARY
SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT.
(F) (1) “QUALIFIED FAMILY MEMBER” MEANS A PARENT, GRANDPARENT,
CHILD, GRANDCHILD, OR SIBLING OF THE OWNER OF THE PRIMARY SINGLE–FAMILY
DETACHED DWELLING UNIT.
(2) “QUALIFIED FAMILY MEMBER” INCLUDES INDIVIDUALS RELATED
TO THE OWNER OF THE PRIMARY SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT
THROUGH ADOPTION OR MARRIAGE.
[(d)] (G) “Utility” means water or sewer disposal services provided by:
(1) a private company regulated under Division I of the Public Utilities
Article;
(2) the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission regulated under
Division II of the Public Utilities Article;
(3) a sanitary commission regulated under Title 9, Subtitle 6 of the
Environment Article; or
(4) a municipal authority regulated under Title 9, Subtitle 7 of the
Environment Article.
4–502.
This subtitle applies only to the development of accessory dwelling units on land with
a single–family detached dwelling unit as the primary dwelling unit.
4–503.

HOUSE BILL 1538
(a) It is the policy of the State to promote and encourage the creation of accessory
dwelling units on land with a single–family detached dwelling unit as the primary dwelling
unit in order to meet the housing needs of the citizens of Maryland.
(b) (1) Except as provided in this subtitle and subject to paragraph (2) of this
subsection, this subtitle does not alter or abrogate any zoning power or related authority
granted to a local jurisdiction under this title.
(2) Local jurisdictions shall establish policies that further the intent of this
subtitle.
4–504.
(a) (1) On or before October 1, 2026, each legislative body shall adopt a local
law authorizing the development of accessory dwelling units in accordance with this
section.
(2) A legislative body may adopt a local law that:
(i) establishes standards for accessory dwelling unit safety; and
(ii) prohibits the full or partial conversion of an accessory structure
as an accessory dwelling unit if the only vehicular access to the accessory structure is from
an alley.
(b) A local law adopted under this section shall provide for construction of
accessory dwelling units that meet public health, safety, and welfare standards, including
relevant building codes and adequate public facilities provisions.
(c) A local law adopted under this section shall:
(1) exclude the development of an accessory dwelling unit from the
calculation of density and the application of any measures limiting residential growth that
pertain to the lot, parcel, or tract proposed for the development of the accessory dwelling
unit; AND
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY DENSITY LIMIT ESTABLISHED UNDER
LOCAL LAW, AUTHORIZE THE DEVELOPMENT OF AT LEAST ONE INTERNAL
ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT AND ONE EXTERNAL ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT ON
LAND WITH A SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT AS THE PRIMARY
DWELLING UNIT.
(d) A local law adopted under this section may not establish setback requirements
that exceed the existing accessory structure setback requirements from the side and rear
lot lines.

HOUSE BILL 1538 5
(e) (1) (i) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
local law adopted under this section may establish additional off–street parking
requirements that consider:
1. the cost to construct off–street parking spaces;
2. whether sufficient curb area exists along the front line of
the property to accommodate on–street parking;
3. the increase in impervious surface due to the creation of
new off–street parking and the relation to any applicable stormwater management plans;
and
4. variability due to the size of the lot, parcel, or tract on
which the accessory dwelling unit or primary dwelling is located.
(ii) A local law adopted under this paragraph shall provide for a
waiver process from the parking requirements.
(2) Before adopting a local law under paragraph (1) of this subsection, a
legislative body shall complete a parking study to determine the applicable needs and
restrictions in the jurisdiction.
(3) A LOCAL LAW ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE
ADDITIONAL OFF–STREET PARKING SPACES FOR AN ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT
THAT IS A CONVERSION OF:
(I) SPACE IN THE PRIMARY SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED
DWELLING UNIT; OR
(II) AN ACCESSORY STRUCTURE ON THE LAND OF THE PRIMARY
SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT.
(F) (1) A UTILITY PROVIDER MAY NOT CHARGE A PROPERTY OWNER
THAT CONSTRUCTS AN ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT THAT WILL BE OCCUPIED BY A
QUALIFIED FAMILY MEMBER:
(I) A WATER OR SEWER CONNECTION FEE THAT EXCEEDS THE
ADMINISTRATIVE COST OF A PERMIT; OR
(II) IF THE TOTAL BEDROOM COUNT OF THE ACCESSORY
DWELLING UNIT AND THE PRIMARY SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT
WILL NOT EXCEED THE CAPACITY OF THE SEPTIC SYSTEM, A CAPACITY CHARGE OR
TAP FEE.

HOUSE BILL 1538
(2) A UTILITY PROVIDER SHALL ALLOW, AT THE REQUEST OF THE
PROPERTY OWNER, AN ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT THAT WILL BE OCCUPIED BY A
QUALIFIED FAMILY MEMBER TO SHARE UTILITY METERS AND SERVICE LATERALS
WITH THE PRIMARY SINGLE–FAMILY DETACHED DWELLING UNIT.
Article – Local Government
20–128.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
4–501 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(3) “DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX” MEANS AN EXCISE TAX IMPOSED BY
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ON THE CONSTRUCTION OR IMPROVEMENT OF A
BUILDING.
(4) “DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE” MEANS A FEE IMPOSED BY A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FINANCING THE CAPITAL COSTS
OF ADDITIONAL OR EXPANDED PUBLIC WORKS, IMPROVEMENTS, AND FACILITIES
REQUIRED TO ACCOMMODATE NEW CONSTRUCTION OR DEVELOPMENT.
(B) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT IMPOSE A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE
TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE IN RELATION TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN
ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT THAT MEASURES LESS THAN 1,000 SQUARE FEET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–252.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
4–501 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(3) “QUALIFIED FAMILY MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
4–501 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1538 7
(B) AN ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT IS NOT SUBJECT TO PROPERTY TAX IF
THE ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT IS OCCUPIED BY A QUALIFIED FAMILY MEMBER.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and that Section 2 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning
after June 30, 2026.